src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beiggi
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: beiggja
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: beiggja
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: beiggja
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: beiggjar
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: beiggjar
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: beiggjum
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: beiggja
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: beiggin
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: beiggjan
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: beiggjanum
    beiggi+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: beiggjans
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: beiggjarnir
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: beiggjarnar
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: beiggjunum
    beiggi+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: beiggjanna
